Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 160.23 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Wind energy facilities shall lease and distribute royalties
to all landowners with adjacent properties within a radius of one
thousand eight hundred (1,800) feet of the base of any wind turbine
in operation.
Royalties shall be paid at an equal rate to all qualifying
landowners within the radius, regardless of whether their property
is directly used for wind turbine construction. If a property
located within the radius is partitioned, subdivided, or
Req. No. 10240 Page 1

tran sferred, the original royalty allocated to that property shall
be divided in an amount proportional to the amount of each owner's
property that lies within the radius, calculated as a fraction of
the total original property area within the radius.
B. This section shall only apply to the construction or
expansion of wind energy facilities constructed or expanded after
the effective date of this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10240 JBH 01/02/25














Req. No. 10240 Page 2